Mississippi, session 20251E, HB7.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is authorized and approved for expenditure out of any funds which are received by or otherwise become available to the Mississippi State Port Authority at Gulfport, for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the authority for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026........................................... ........................................... $ 78,539,426.00. SECTION 2.  Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of Section 1, the following positions are authorized: AUTHORIZED HEADCOUNT: Permanent:           39 Time-Limited:         0 Any transfers or escalations shall be made in accordance with the terms, conditions and procedures established by law. No general funds authorized to be expended herein shall be used to replace federal funds and/or other special funds which are being used for salaries authorized under the provisions of this act and which are withdrawn and no longer available. SECTION 3.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the Mississippi State Port Authority at Gulfport shall maintain complete accounting and personnel records related to the expenditure of all funds appropriated under this act and that such records shall be in the same format and level of detail as maintained for Fiscal Year 2025.  It is further the intention of the Legislature that the agency's budget request for Fiscal Year 2027 shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in a format and level of detail comparable to the format and level of detail provided during the Fiscal Year 2026 budget request process. SECTION 4.  It is the intention of the Legislature that whenever two (2) or more bids are received by this agency for the purchase of commodities or equipment, and whenever all things stated in such received bids are equal with respect to price, quality and service, the Mississippi Industries for the Blind shall be given preference.  A similar preference shall be given to the Mississippi Industries for the Blind whenever purchases are made without competitive bids. SECTION 5.  Of the funds appropriated herein, One Hundred Thirty-five Thousand Dollars ($135,000.00) is provided for the purpose of funding overtime, callback or standby pay. SECTION 6.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the Mississippi State Port Authority at Gulfport shall only expend funds on activities directly related to the operation of the state port. SECTION 7.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the funds herein appropriated shall be expended in compliance with Section 27-104-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, that no state agency shall incur obligations or indebtedness in excess of their appropriation and that the responsible officers, either personally or upon their official bonds, shall be held responsible for actions contrary to this provision. SECTION 8.  The money appropriated under the provisions of Section 1 shall be disbursed upon bank checks signed by the proper person, officer or officers, in the manner provided by law. SECTION 9.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2025.